West Virginia, session 2026, SB260.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Authorization for Department of envirnomental protection to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 3 - 1. Department of Environmental Protection. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §22-5-4 of this code, relating to the Department of Environmental Protection (control of air pollution from hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities, 45 CSR 25), is authorized.